West Virginia, session 2025, HB3205.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:ARTICLE 15. UNIFORM PUBLIC EXPRESSION PROTECTION ACT.§6-15-1. Short title.This article may be cited as the Uniform Public Expression Protection Act.§6-15-2. Definitions and scope. (a) For purposes of this article:(1) "Goods or services" does not include the creation, dissemination, exhibition, or advertisement or similar promotion of a dramatic, literary, musical, political, journalistic, or artistic work;(2) "Governmental unit" means a public corporation or government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;(3) "Person" means an individual, estate, trust, partnership, business or nonprofit entity, governmental unit, or other legal entity;(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), this Act applies to a cause of action asserted in a civil action against a person based on the person’s:(1) Communication in a legislative, executive, judicial, administrative, or other governmental proceeding;(2) Communication on an issue under consideration or review in a legislative, executive, judicial, administrative, or other governmental proceeding; or(3) Exercise of the right of freedom of speech or of the press, the right to assemble or petition, or the right of association, guaranteed by the United States Constitution or [cite to the state’s constitution], on a matter of public concern.(c) This Act does not apply to a cause of action asserted:(1) Against a governmental unit or an employee or agent of a governmental unit acting or purporting to act in an official capacity;(2) By a governmental unit or an employee or agent of a governmental unit acting in an official capacity to enforce a law to protect against an imminent threat to public health or safety; or(3) Against a person primarily engaged in the business of selling or leasing goods or services if the [cause of action] arises out of a communication related to the person’s sale or lease of the goods or services.§6-15-3. Special motion for expedited relief. Not later than 60 days after a party is served with a complaint, crossclaim, counterclaim, third-party claim, or other pleading that asserts a cause of action to which this code applies, or at a later time on a showing of good cause, the party may file a special motion for expedited relief to dismiss the cause of action or part of the cause of action.§6-15-4. Stay. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) through (g), on the filing of a motion under §6-15-3:(1) All other proceedings between the moving party and responding party, including discovery and a pending hearing or motion, are stayed; and  (2) On motion by the moving party, the court may stay a hearing or motion involving another party, or discovery by another party, if the hearing or ruling on the motion would adjudicate, or the discovery would relate to, an issue material to the motion under §6-15-3.(b) A stay under subsection (a) remains in effect until entry of an order ruling on the motion under §6-15-3 and expiration of the time under §6-15-9 for the moving party to appeal the order.(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e), (f), and (g), if a party appeals from an order ruling on a motion under §6-15-3, all proceedings between all parties in the action are stayed.  The stay remains in effect until the conclusion of the appeal.(d) During a stay under subsection (a), the court may allow limited discovery if a party shows that specific information is necessary to establish whether a party has satisfied or failed to satisfy a burden under Section 7(a) and the information is not reasonably available unless discovery is allowed.(e) A motion under §6-15-10 for costs, attorney’s fees, and expenses is not subject to a stay under this section.(f) A stay under this section does not affect a party’s ability voluntarily to dismiss a cause of action or part of a cause of action]or move to sever a cause of action. (g) During a stay under this section, the court for good cause may hear and rule on: (1) a motion unrelated to the motion under §6-15-3; and(2) a motion seeking a special or preliminary injunction to protect against an imminent threat to public health or safety.§6-15-5. Hearing. (a) The court shall hear a motion under §6-15-3 not later than 60 days after filing of the motion, unless the court orders a later hearing:(1) To allow discovery under Section 4(d); or(2) For other good cause.(b) If the court orders a later hearing under subsection (a)(1), the court shall hear the motion under §6-15-3 not later than 60 days after the court order allowing the discovery, unless the court orders a later hearing under subsection (a)(2).§6-15-6. Proof. In ruling on a motion under §6-15-3, the court shall consider the pleadings, the motion, any reply or response to the motion, and any evidence that could be considered in ruling on a motion for summary judgment. §6-15-7. Dismissal of cause of action in whole or in part.  (a) In ruling on a motion under §6-15-3, the court shall dismiss with prejudice a cause of action, or part of a cause of action, if:(1) The moving party establishes under §6-15-2(b) that this act applies;(2) The responding party fails to establish under §6-15-2(c) that this act does not apply; and(3) Either:(A) The responding party fails to establish a prima facie case as to each essential element of the cause of action; or(B) The moving party establishes that:(i) The responding party failed to state a cause of action upon which relief can be granted; or(ii) There is no genuine issue as to any material fact and the moving party is entitled to judgment as a matter of law on the cause of action or part of the cause of action.(b) A voluntary dismissal without prejudice of a responding party’s cause of action, or part of a cause of action, that is the subject of a motion under §6-15-3 does not affect a moving party’s right to obtain a ruling on the motion and seek costs, attorney’s fees, and expenses under §6-15-10.(c) A voluntary dismissal with prejudice of a responding party’s cause of action, or part of a cause of action, that is the subject of a motion under §6-15-3 establishes for the purpose of §6-15-10 that the moving party prevailed on the motion.§6-15-8. Ruling. The court shall rule on a motion under §6-15-3 not later than 60 days after a hearing under §6-15-5.§6-15-9. Appeal.  A moving party may appeal as a matter of right from an order denying, in whole or in part, a motion under §6-15-3 to the West Virginia Intermediate Court of Appeals, created by §51-11-1 et seq. of this code. The appeal shall be filed in accordance with the West Virginia Rules of Civil Procedure and must be filed not later than 21 days after entry of the order.  §6-15-10. Costs, attorney's fees, and expenses. On a motion under §6-15-3, the court shall award court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and reasonable litigation expenses related to the motion:(1) to the moving party if the moving party prevails on the motion; or (2) to the responding party if the responding party prevails on the motion and the court finds that the motion was frivolous or filed solely with intent to delay the proceeding.§6-15-11. Construction.   This article must be broadly construed and applied to protect the exercise of the right of freedom of speech and of the press, the right to assemble and petition, and the right of association, guaranteed by the United States Constitution or the Constitution of West Virginia.§6-15-12. Uniformity of application and construction.  In applying and construing this Uniform Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.§6-15-13. Transitional provision.  This article applies to a civil action filed or cause of action asserted in a civil action on or after the effective date of this Act.§6-15-14. Severability.  If any provision of this article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.§6-15-15. Effective date.  This article takes effect upon passage.